Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1924
Statement, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-1922 and 29-1923, statement made by the defendant includes any of the following statements made by the defendant which relate to the investigation of the underlying charge or charges in the case and which were developed or received by law enforcement agencies:

(1) Written or recorded statements;

(2) Written summaries of oral statements; and

(3) The substance of oral statements.

Laws 1969, c. 230, § 3, p. 858;

Laws 1983, LB 110, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB496, § 11.